Louisiana, session 2026, HB1091.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1567(A)(1)(a) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1567. Fire departments; fire department identification number; fire reports
A.(1)(a) Every municipal fire department, fire protection district, and
volunteer fire department, as recognized by its local governing authority, shall obtain
a fire department identification (FDID) number from the state fire marshal National
Emergency Response Information System.
* * *
B. Organizations which have been issued an FDID number shall submit
structural fire reports of all incidents electronically pursuant to the standards set by
the state fire marshal.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.